Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-310
Formation of subdivision or district; special assessment; notice; copy to nonresident property owners.

Before any political subdivision, except any city of the metropolitan class, or special taxing district for public works or public improvements shall be formed, and before any political subdivision or special taxing district, excepting any city of the metropolitan class and school districts, may impose any special assessment for public works or public improvements, a copy of any notice required to be published by law shall be mailed to the last-known address of all nonresident property owners as shown on the current tax rolls at the time such notice is first published.

Laws 1973, LB 344, § 1;

Laws 1974, LB 655, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 18-1216.